Nevada, session 83, AB182.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 218E of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in
sections 3 and 4 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in
those sections.
Sec. 3. “Agency” means an agency, bureau, board,
commission, department, division or any other unit of the State
Government.
Sec. 4. “Committee” means the Legislative Committee on the
Reduction of Nonessential State Expenditures created by section 5
of this act.
Sec. 5. 1. The Legislative Committee on the Reduction of
Nonessential State Expenditures is hereby created. The
membership of the Committee consists of:
(a) Two members of the Senate appointed by the Majority
Leader of the Senate;
(b) Two members of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of
the Assembly;
(c) One member of the Senate appointed by the Minority
Leader of the Senate; and
(d) One member of the Assembly appointed by the Minority
Leader of the Assembly.
2. The Legislative Commission shall review and approve the
budget and work program for the Committee and any changes to
the budget or work program.
3. The Legislative Commission shall select a Chair and Vice
Chair of the Committee from among the members of the
Committee. After the initial selection, each Chair and Vice Chair
holds office for a term of 2 years commencing on July 1 of each
odd-numbered year. The office of Chair of the Committee must
alternate each biennium between the Houses. If a vacancy occurs
in the office of the Chair or Vice Chair, the vacancy must be filled
in the same manner as the original selection for the remainder of
the unexpired term.
4. A member of the Committee who is not a candidate for
reelection or who is defeated for reelection continues to serve after
-
*AB182*

– 3 –
the general election until the next regular or special session of the
Legislature convenes.
5. A vacancy on the Committee must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
Sec. 6. 1. Except as otherwise ordered by the Legislative
Commission, the members of the Committee shall meet not earlier
than September 1 of each odd-numbered year and not later than
August 31 of the following even-numbered year at the times and
places specified by a call of the Chair or a majority of the
Committee.
2. The Director or the Director’s designee shall act as the
nonvoting recording Secretary of the Committee.
3. Four members of the Committee constitute a quorum, and
a quorum may exercise all the power and authority conferred on
the Committee.
4. Except during a regular or special session of the
Legislature, for each day or portion of a day during which a
member of the Committee attends a meeting of the Committee or is
otherwise engaged in the business of the Committee, the member
is entitled to receive the:
(a) Compensation provided for a majority of the members of
the Legislature during the first 60 days of the preceding regular
session;
(b) Per diem allowance provided for state officers and
employees generally; and
(c) Travel expenses provided pursuant to NRS 218A.655.
5. All such compensation, per diem allowances and travel
expenses must be paid from the Legislative Fund.
Sec. 7. 1. The Committee shall review and evaluate issues
relating to state governmental spending and efficiency. The
Committee shall:
(a) Identify areas in which state expenditures may be
eliminated or avoided, including, without limitation, by identifying
programs or services provided by agencies that the Committee
determines are duplicative of other programs or services,
ineffective or nonessential for the operation of the State
Government.
(b) Identify areas in which the costs to an agency of providing
services that the Committee determines are essential for the
operation of the State Government may be reduced, including,
without limitation, areas in which increased efficiencies may be
found.
(c) Upon concluding that an agency:
-
*AB182*

– 4 –
(1) May be engaging in abuse, fraud or waste with respect
to public money, investigate the agency.
(2) Is engaged in abuse, fraud or waste with respect to
public money, provide written notice to the agency of that
determination. Such notice must include, without limitation, any
recommendations for corrective action by the agency.
2. Each agency shall:
(a) Collaborate with the Committee in carrying out the duties
prescribed in this section; and
(b) Provide the Committee with any information requested by
the Committee as soon as is reasonably practicable after receiving
the request.
3. An agency that receives notice of a determination by the
Committee that the agency is engaged in abuse, fraud or waste
pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (c) of subsection 1
shall, upon the request of the Committee, provide the Committee
with a written report regarding any corrective actions taken by the
agency to implement the recommendations made by the Committee
pursuant to that subparagraph.
Sec. 8. 1. The Committee may:
(a) Conduct investigations and hold hearings in connection
with its duties pursuant to section 7 of this act and exercise any of
the investigative powers set forth in NRS 218E.105 to 218E.140,
inclusive.
(b) Request that the Legislative Counsel Bureau assist in the
research, investigations, hearings and reviews of the Committee.
(c) Recommend to the Legislature, as a result of its review and
evaluation, any appropriate legislation concerning state
governmental spending and efficiency.
2. On or before October 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Committee shall:
(a) Compile a report describing the activities of the Committee
during the legislative interim. The report must include, without
limitation:
(1) Any recommendations for legislation considered by the
Committee. The report must indicate, for each such
recommendation, whether the recommendation was approved by a
majority vote of all of the members of the Committee.
(2) A summary of the areas identified by the Committee in
which state expenditures may be eliminated or avoided pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of section 7 of this act.
(3) A summary of the areas identified by the Committee in
which state expenditures may be reduced pursuant to paragraph
(b) of subsection 1 of section 7 of this act.
-
*AB182*

– 5 –
(4) A summary of any investigation conducted pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of section 7 of this act and any
recommendations for corrective action made by the Committee.
(5) A summary of any corrective action taken by an agency
to implement any recommendations made by the Committee of
which the Committee is aware.
(b) Submit the report to the Director for transmittal to the
Legislature.
3. The Committee may submit to the Director for transmittal
to the Interim Finance Committee or the Legislature any such
additional reports as it deems appropriate.
Sec. 9. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 10. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB182*